Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB161.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2(5) of the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 2. Definitions.--As used in this act--* * *(5) "Public work" means construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration and/or repair work other than maintenance work, done under contract and paid for in whole or in part out of the funds of a public body where the estimated cost of the total project is in excess of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), but shall not include school safety and security 12345678910111213141516171819 improvements or work performed under a rehabilitation or manpower training program.* * *(11) "School safety and security improvements" means construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair work performed to enhance or improve school safety and security, which is:(i) recommended or identified by a school safety and security assessment performed under Article XIII-B of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the "Public School Code of 1949";(ii) paid for in whole or in part from money provided under section 1306-B of the "Public School Code of 1949"; or(iii) identified in the criteria developed by the school safety and security committee under section 1303-B of the "Public School Code of 1949."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0161PN0119 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617